vendor/wikimedia/langconv/fst/crh-exceptions-save.foma
define CRH'LATN'EXCEPTIONS [
  {февкъульаде} @-> {fevqulade} ,,
  {Февкъульаде} @-> {Fevqulade} ,,
  {ФЕВКЪУЛЬАДЕ} @-> {FEVQULADE} ,,
  {бейуде} @-> {beyüde} ,,
  {Бейуде} @-> {Beyüde} ,,
  {БЕЙУДЕ} @-> {BEYÜDE} ,,
  {джурьат} @-> {cürat} ,,
  {Джурьат} @-> {Cürat} ,,
  {ДЖУРЬАТ} @-> {CÜRAT} ,,
  {месуль} @-> {mesül} ,,
  {Месуль} @-> {Mesül} ,,
  {МЕСУЛЬ} @-> {MESÜL} ,,
  {етсин} @-> {etsin} ,,
  {Етсин} @-> {Etsin} ,,
  {ЕТСИН} @-> {ETSİN} ,,
  {аджыумер} @-> {acıümer} ,,
  {Аджыумер} @-> {Acıümer} ,,
  {АДЖЫУМЕР} @-> {ACIÜMER} ,,
  {аджыусеин} @-> {acıüsein} ,,
  {Аджыусеин} @-> {Acıüsein} ,,
  {АДЖЫУСЕИН} @-> {ACIÜSEİN} ,,
  {алейкум} @-> {aleyküm} ,,
  {Алейкум} @-> {Aleyküm} ,,
  {АЛЕЙКУМ} @-> {ALEYKÜM} ,,
  {бозтюс} @-> {boztüs} ,,
  {Бозтюс} @-> {Boztüs} ,,
  {БОЗТЮС} @-> {BOZTÜS} ,,
  {боливия} @-> {boliviya} ,,
  {Боливия} @-> {Boliviya} ,,
  {БОЛИВИЯ} @-> {BOLİVİYA} ,,
  {большевик} @-> {bolşevik} ,,
  {Большевик} @-> {Bolşevik} ,,
  {БОЛЬШЕВИК} @-> {BOLŞEVİK} ,,
  {борис} @-> {boris} ,,
  {Борис} @-> {Boris} ,,
  {БОРИС} @-> {BORİS} ,,
  {борнен} @-> {bornen} ,,
  {Борнен} @-> {Bornen} ,,
  {БОРНЕН} @-> {BORNEN} ,,
  {бублик} @-> {bublik} ,,
  {Бублик} @-> {Bublik} ,,
  {БУБЛИК} @-> {BUBLİK} ,,
  {буддизм} @-> {buddizm} ,,
  {Буддизм} @-> {Buddizm} ,,
  {БУДДИЗМ} @-> {BUDDİZM} ,,
  {буддист} @-> {buddist} ,,
  {Буддист} @-> {Buddist} ,,
  {БУДДИСТ} @-> {BUDDİST} ,,
  {буженина} @-> {bujenina} ,,
  {Буженина} @-> {Bujenina} ,,
  {БУЖЕНИНА} @-> {BUJENİNA} ,,
  {бузкесен} @-> {buzkesen} ,,
  {Бузкесен} @-> {Buzkesen} ,,
  {БУЗКЕСЕН} @-> {BUZKESEN} ,,
  {букинист} @-> {bukinist} ,,
  {Букинист} @-> {Bukinist} ,,
  {БУКИНИСТ} @-> {BUKİNİST} ,,
  {буксир} @-> {buksir} ,,
  {Буксир} @-> {Buksir} ,,
  {БУКСИР} @-> {BUKSİR} ,,
  {бульбул} @-> {bülbül} ,,
  {Бульбул} @-> {Bülbül} ,,
  {БУЛЬБУЛ} @-> {BÜLBÜL} ,,
  {бульвар} @-> {bulvar} ,,
  {Бульвар} @-> {Bulvar} ,,
  {БУЛЬВАР} @-> {BULVAR} ,,
  {бульдог} @-> {buldog} ,,
  {Бульдог} @-> {Buldog} ,,
  {БУЛЬДОГ} @-> {BULDOG} ,,
  {бульдозер} @-> {buldozer} ,,
  {Бульдозер} @-> {Buldozer} ,,
  {БУЛЬДОЗЕР} @-> {BULDOZER} ,,
  {бульон} @-> {bulyon} ,,
  {Бульон} @-> {Bulyon} ,,
  {БУЛЬОН} @-> {BULYON} ,,
  {бумеранг} @-> {bumerang} ,,
  {Бумеранг} @-> {Bumerang} ,,
  {БУМЕРАНГ} @-> {BUMERANG} ,,
  {бунен} @-> {bunen} ,,
  {Бунен} @-> {Bunen} ,,
  {БУНЕН} @-> {BUNEN} ,,
  {буннен} @-> {bunnen} ,,
  {Буннен} @-> {Bunnen} ,,
  {БУННЕН} @-> {BUNNEN} ,,
  {бус-бутюн} @-> {büs-bütün} ,,
  {Бус-бутюн} @-> {Büs-bütün} ,,
  {БУС-БУТЮН} @-> {BÜS-BÜTÜN} ,,
  {бутерброд} @-> {buterbrod} ,,
  {Бутерброд} @-> {Buterbrod} ,,
  {БУТЕРБРОД} @-> {BUTERBROD} ,,
  {бутилен} @-> {butilen} ,,
  {Бутилен} @-> {Butilen} ,,
  {БУТИЛЕН} @-> {BUTİLEN} ,,
  {бутилир} @-> {butilir} ,,
  {Бутилир} @-> {Butilir} ,,
  {БУТИЛИР} @-> {BUTİLİR} ,,
  {буфер} @-> {bufer} ,,
  {Буфер} @-> {Bufer} ,,
  {БУФЕР} @-> {BUFER} ,,
  {буфет} @-> {bufet} ,,
  {Буфет} @-> {Bufet} ,,
  {БУФЕТ} @-> {BUFET} ,,
  {гобелен} @-> {gobelen} ,,
  {Гобелен} @-> {Gobelen} ,,
  {ГОБЕЛЕН} @-> {GOBELEN} ,,
  {гомео} @-> {gomeo} ,,
  {Гомео} @-> {Gomeo} ,,
  {ГОМЕО} @-> {GOMEO} ,,
  {горизонт} @-> {gorizont} ,,
  {Горизонт} @-> {Gorizont} ,,
  {ГОРИЗОНТ} @-> {GORİZONT} ,,
  {госпитал} @-> {gospital} ,,
  {Госпитал} @-> {Gospital} ,,
  {ГОСПИТАЛ} @-> {GOSPİTAL} ,,
  {готтентот} @-> {gottentot} ,,
  {Готтентот} @-> {Gottentot} ,,
  {ГОТТЕНТОТ} @-> {GOTTENTOT} ,,
  {гофрир} @-> {gofrir} ,,
  {Гофрир} @-> {Gofrir} ,,
  {ГОФРИР} @-> {GOFRİR} ,,
  {губерн} @-> {gubern} ,,
  {Губерн} @-> {Gubern} ,,
  {ГУБЕРН} @-> {GUBERN} ,,
  {гуверн} @-> {guvern} ,,
  {Гуверн} @-> {Guvern} ,,
  {ГУВЕРН} @-> {GUVERN} ,,
  {гугенот} @-> {gugenot} ,,
  {Гугенот} @-> {Gugenot} ,,
  {ГУГЕНОТ} @-> {GUGENOT} ,,
  {гуливер} @-> {guliver} ,,
  {Гуливер} @-> {Guliver} ,,
  {ГУЛИВЕР} @-> {GULİVER} ,,
  {гуна} @-> {güna} ,,
  {Гуна} @-> {Güna} ,,
  {ГУНА} @-> {GÜNA} ,,
  {гунях} @-> {günâh} ,,
  {Гунях} @-> {Günâh} ,,
  {ГУНЯХ} @-> {GÜNÂH} ,,
  {гургуль} @-> {gürgül} ,,
  {Гургуль} @-> {Gürgül} ,,
  {ГУРГУЛЬ} @-> {GÜRGÜL} ,,
  {гуя} @-> {güya} ,,
  {Гуя} @-> {Güya} ,,
  {ГУЯ} @-> {GÜYA} ,,
  {дёрткуль} @-> {dörtkül} ,,
  {Дёрткуль} @-> {Dörtkül} ,,
  {ДЁРТКУЛЬ} @-> {DÖRTKÜL} ,,
  {джуньджу} @-> {cüncü} ,,
  {Джуньджу} @-> {Cüncü} ,,
  {ДЖУНЬДЖУ} @-> {CÜNCÜ} ,,
  {ёлнен} @-> {yolnen} ,,
  {Ёлнен} @-> {Yolnen} ,,
  {ЁЛНЕН} @-> {YOLNEN} ,,
  {зумбуль} @-> {zümbül} ,,
  {Зумбуль} @-> {Zümbül} ,,
  {ЗУМБУЛЬ} @-> {ZÜMBÜL} ,,
  {ильи} @-> {ilyi} ,,
  {Ильи} @-> {İlyi} ,,
  {ИЛЬИ} @-> {İLYİ} ,,
  {ишунь} @-> {işün} ,,
  {Ишунь} @-> {İşün} ,,
  {ИШУНЬ} @-> {İŞÜN} ,,
  {ковер} @-> {kover} ,,
  {Ковер} @-> {Kover} ,,
  {КОВЕР} @-> {KOVER} ,,
  {код} @-> {kod} ,,
  {Код} @-> {Kod} ,,
  {КОД} @-> {KOD} ,,
  {койлю} @-> {köylü} ,,
  {Койлю} @-> {Köylü} ,,
  {КОЙЛЮ} @-> {KÖYLÜ} ,,
  {кокагъач} @-> {kökağaç} ,,
  {Кокагъач} @-> {Kökağaç} ,,
  {КОКАГЪАЧ} @-> {KÖKAĞAÇ} ,,
  {кокбаштанкъара} @-> {kökbaştanqara} ,,
  {Кокбаштанкъара} @-> {Kökbaştanqara} ,,
  {КОКБАШТАНКЪАРА} @-> {KÖKBAŞTANQARA} ,,
  {кокгогерджин} @-> {kökgögercin} ,,
  {Кокгогерджин} @-> {Kökgögercin} ,,
  {КОКГОГЕРДЖИН} @-> {KÖKGÖGERCİN} ,,
  {кокдогъан} @-> {kökdoğan} ,,
  {Кокдогъан} @-> {Kökdoğan} ,,
  {КОКДОГЪАН} @-> {KÖKDOĞAN} ,,
  {коккозю} @-> {kökközü} ,,
  {Коккозю} @-> {Kökközü} ,,
  {КОККОЗЮ} @-> {KÖKKÖZÜ} ,,
  {коккъузгъун} @-> {kökquzğun} ,,
  {Коккъузгъун} @-> {Kökquzğun} ,,
  {КОККЪУЗГЪУН} @-> {KÖKQUZĞUN} ,,
  {коклюш} @-> {koklüş} ,,
  {Коклюш} @-> {Koklüş} ,,
  {КОКЛЮШ} @-> {KOKLÜŞ} ,,
  {кокташ} @-> {köktaş} ,,
  {Кокташ} @-> {Köktaş} ,,
  {КОКТАШ} @-> {KÖKTAŞ} ,,
  {коктогъан} @-> {köktoğan} ,,
  {Коктогъан} @-> {Köktoğan} ,,
  {КОКТОГЪАН} @-> {KÖKTOĞAN} ,,
  {коктотай} @-> {köktotay} ,,
  {Коктотай} @-> {Köktotay} ,,
  {КОКТОТАЙ} @-> {KÖKTOTAY} ,,
  {коллег} @-> {kolleg} ,,
  {Коллег} @-> {Kolleg} ,,
  {КОЛЛЕГ} @-> {KOLLEG} ,,
  {коллект} @-> {kollekt} ,,
  {Коллект} @-> {Kollekt} ,,
  {КОЛЛЕКТ} @-> {KOLLEKT} ,,
  {коллекц} @-> {kollekts} ,,
  {Коллекц} @-> {Kollekts} ,,
  {КОЛЛЕКЦ} @-> {KOLLEKTS} ,,
  {колье} @-> {kolye} ,,
  {Колье} @-> {Kolye} ,,
  {КОЛЬЕ} @-> {KOLYE} ,,
  {кольраби} @-> {kolrabi} ,,
  {Кольраби} @-> {Kolrabi} ,,
  {КОЛЬРАБИ} @-> {KOLRABİ} ,,
  {кольцов} @-> {koltsov} ,,
  {Кольцов} @-> {Koltsov} ,,
  {КОЛЬЦОВ} @-> {KOLTSOV} ,,
  {комби} @-> {kombi} ,,
  {Комби} @-> {Kombi} ,,
  {КОМБИ} @-> {KOMBİ} ,,
  {комеди} @-> {komedi} ,,
  {Комеди} @-> {Komedi} ,,
  {КОМЕДИ} @-> {KOMEDİ} ,,
  {коменда} @-> {komenda} ,,
  {Коменда} @-> {Komenda} ,,
  {КОМЕНДА} @-> {KOMENDA} ,,
  {комета} @-> {kometa} ,,
  {Комета} @-> {Kometa} ,,
  {КОМЕТА} @-> {KOMETA} ,,
  {комив} @-> {komiv} ,,
  {Комив} @-> {Komiv} ,,
  {КОМИВ} @-> {KOMİV} ,,
  {комис} @-> {komis} ,,
  {Комис} @-> {Komis} ,,
  {КОМИС} @-> {KOMİS} ,,
  {комит} @-> {komit} ,,
  {Комит} @-> {Komit} ,,
  {КОМИТ} @-> {KOMİT} ,,
  {комм} @-> {komm} ,,
  {Комм} @-> {Komm} ,,
  {КОММ} @-> {KOMM} ,,
  {коммент} @-> {komment} ,,
  {Коммент} @-> {Komment} ,,
  {КОММЕНТ} @-> {KOMMENT} ,,
  {коммерс} @-> {kommers} ,,
  {Коммерс} @-> {Kommers} ,,
  {КОММЕРС} @-> {KOMMERS} ,,
  {коммерц} @-> {kommerts} ,,
  {Коммерц} @-> {Kommerts} ,,
  {КОММЕРЦ} @-> {KOMMERTS} ,,
  {комп} @-> {komp} ,,
  {Комп} @-> {Komp} ,,
  {КОМП} @-> {KOMP} ,,
  {конве} @-> {konve} ,,
  {Конве} @-> {Konve} ,,
  {КОНВЕ} @-> {KONVE} ,,
  {конгени} @-> {kongeni} ,,
  {Конгени} @-> {Kongeni} ,,
  {КОНГЕНИ} @-> {KONGENİ} ,,
  {конденс} @-> {kondens} ,,
  {Конденс} @-> {Kondens} ,,
  {КОНДЕНС} @-> {KONDENS} ,,
  {кондил} @-> {kondil} ,,
  {Кондил} @-> {Kondil} ,,
  {КОНДИЛ} @-> {KONDİL} ,,
  {кондитер} @-> {konditer} ,,
  {Кондитер} @-> {Konditer} ,,
  {КОНДИТЕР} @-> {KONDİTER} ,,
  {кондиц} @-> {kondits} ,,
  {Кондиц} @-> {Kondits} ,,
  {КОНДИЦ} @-> {KONDİTS} ,,
  {коник} @-> {konik} ,,
  {Коник} @-> {Konik} ,,
  {КОНИК} @-> {KONİK} ,,
  {конкис} @-> {konkis} ,,
  {Конкис} @-> {Konkis} ,,
  {КОНКИС} @-> {KONKİS} ,,
  {консерв} @-> {konserv} ,,
  {Консерв} @-> {Konserv} ,,
  {КОНСЕРВ} @-> {KONSERV} ,,
  {конси} @-> {konsi} ,,
  {Конси} @-> {Konsi} ,,
  {КОНСИ} @-> {KONSİ} ,,
  {контейнер} @-> {konteyner} ,,
  {Контейнер} @-> {Konteyner} ,,
  {КОНТЕЙНЕР} @-> {KONTEYNER} ,,
  {конти} @-> {konti} ,,
  {Конти} @-> {Konti} ,,
  {КОНТИ} @-> {KONTİ} ,,
  {конфе} @-> {konfe} ,,
  {Конфе} @-> {Konfe} ,,
  {КОНФЕ} @-> {KONFE} ,,
  {конфи} @-> {konfi} ,,
  {Конфи} @-> {Konfi} ,,
  {КОНФИ} @-> {KONFİ} ,,
  {конце} @-> {kontse} ,,
  {Конце} @-> {Kontse} ,,
  {КОНЦЕ} @-> {KONTSE} ,,
  {конъю} @-> {konyu} ,,
  {Конъю} @-> {Konyu} ,,
  {КОНЪЮ} @-> {KONYU} ,,
  {коньки} @-> {konki} ,,
  {Коньки} @-> {Konki} ,,
  {КОНЬКИ} @-> {KONKİ} ,,
  {коньяк} @-> {konyak} ,,
  {Коньяк} @-> {Konyak} ,,
  {КОНЬЯК} @-> {KONYAK} ,,
  {копирле} @-> {kopirle} ,,
  {Копирле} @-> {Kopirle} ,,
  {КОПИРЛЕ} @-> {KOPİRLE} ,,
  {копия} @-> {kopiya} ,,
  {Копия} @-> {Kopiya} ,,
  {КОПИЯ} @-> {KOPİYA} ,,
  {корде} @-> {korde} ,,
  {Корде} @-> {Korde} ,,
  {КОРДЕ} @-> {KORDE} ,,
  {кореиз} @-> {koreiz} ,,
  {Кореиз} @-> {Koreiz} ,,
  {КОРЕИЗ} @-> {KOREİZ} ,,
  {коренн} @-> {korenn} ,,
  {Коренн} @-> {Korenn} ,,
  {КОРЕНН} @-> {KORENN} ,,
  {корея} @-> {koreya} ,,
  {Корея} @-> {Koreya} ,,
  {КОРЕЯ} @-> {KOREYA} ,,
  {кориа} @-> {koria} ,,
  {Кориа} @-> {Koria} ,,
  {КОРИА} @-> {KORİA} ,,
  {коридор} @-> {koridor} ,,
  {Коридор} @-> {Koridor} ,,
  {КОРИДОР} @-> {KORİDOR} ,,
  {корне} @-> {korne} ,,
  {Корне} @-> {Korne} ,,
  {КОРНЕ} @-> {KORNE} ,,
  {корнеев} @-> {korneyev} ,,
  {Корнеев} @-> {Korneyev} ,,
  {КОРНЕЕВ} @-> {KORNEYEV} ,,
  {корни} @-> {korni} ,,
  {Корни} @-> {Korni} ,,
  {КОРНИ} @-> {KORNİ} ,,
  {корре} @-> {korre} ,,
  {Корре} @-> {Korre} ,,
  {КОРРЕ} @-> {KORRE} ,,
  {косме} @-> {kosme} ,,
  {Косме} @-> {Kosme} ,,
  {КОСМЕ} @-> {KOSME} ,,
  {космик} @-> {kosmik} ,,
  {Космик} @-> {Kosmik} ,,
  {КОСМИК} @-> {KOSMİK} ,,
  {костюм} @-> {kostüm} ,,
  {Костюм} @-> {Kostüm} ,,
  {КОСТЮМ} @-> {KOSTÜM} ,,
  {котельн} @-> {koteln} ,,
  {Котельн} @-> {Koteln} ,,
  {КОТЕЛЬН} @-> {KOTELN} ,,
  {котир} @-> {kotir} ,,
  {Котир} @-> {Kotir} ,,
  {КОТИР} @-> {KOTİR} ,,
  {котлет} @-> {kotlet} ,,
  {Котлет} @-> {Kotlet} ,,
  {КОТЛЕТ} @-> {KOTLET} ,,
  {кочерг} @-> {koçerg} ,,
  {Кочерг} @-> {Koçerg} ,,
  {КОЧЕРГ} @-> {KOÇERG} ,,
  {коше} @-> {köşe} ,,
  {Коше} @-> {Köşe} ,,
  {КОШЕ} @-> {KÖŞE} ,,
  {куби} @-> {kubi} ,,
  {Куби} @-> {Kubi} ,,
  {КУБИ} @-> {KUBİ} ,,
  {кудрин} @-> {kudrin} ,,
  {Кудрин} @-> {Kudrin} ,,
  {КУДРИН} @-> {KUDRİN} ,,
  {кузнец} @-> {kuznets} ,,
  {Кузнец} @-> {Kuznets} ,,
  {КУЗНЕЦ} @-> {KUZNETS} ,,
  {кулинар} @-> {kulinar} ,,
  {Кулинар} @-> {Kulinar} ,,
  {КУЛИНАР} @-> {KULİNAR} ,,
  {кулич} @-> {kuliç} ,,
  {Кулич} @-> {Kuliç} ,,
  {КУЛИЧ} @-> {KULİÇ} ,,
  {кульмин} @-> {kulmin} ,,
  {Кульмин} @-> {Kulmin} ,,
  {КУЛЬМИН} @-> {KULMİN} ,,
  {культаш} @-> {kültaş} ,,
  {Культаш} @-> {Kültaş} ,,
  {КУЛЬТАШ} @-> {KÜLTAŞ} ,,
  {культе} @-> {külte} ,,
  {Культе} @-> {Külte} ,,
  {КУЛЬТЕ} @-> {KÜLTE} ,,
  {культ} @-> {kult} ,,
  {Культ} @-> {Kult} ,,
  {КУЛЬТ} @-> {KULT} ,,
  {куркулет} @-> {kürkület} ,,
  {Куркулет} @-> {Kürkület} ,,
  {КУРКУЛЕТ} @-> {KÜRKÜLET} ,,
  {курсив} @-> {kursiv} ,,
  {Курсив} @-> {Kursiv} ,,
  {КУРСИВ} @-> {KURSİV} ,,
  {кушет} @-> {kuşet} ,,
  {Кушет} @-> {Kuşet} ,,
  {КУШЕТ} @-> {KUŞET} ,,
  {кушку} @-> {küşkü} ,,
  {Кушку} @-> {Küşkü} ,,
  {КУШКУ} @-> {KÜŞKÜ} ,,
  {куюк} @-> {küyük} ,,
  {Куюк} @-> {Küyük} ,,
  {КУЮК} @-> {KÜYÜK} ,,
  {къолязма} @-> {qolyazma} ,,
  {Къолязма} @-> {Qolyazma} ,,
  {КЪОЛЯЗМА} @-> {QOLYAZMA} ,,
  {къуртумер} @-> {qurtümer} ,,
  {Къуртумер} @-> {Qurtümer} ,,
  {КЪУРТУМЕР} @-> {QURTÜMER} ,,
  {къуртусеин} @-> {qurtüsein} ,,
  {Къуртусеин} @-> {Qurtüsein} ,,
  {КЪУРТУСЕИН} @-> {QURTÜSEİN} ,,
  {медьюн} @-> {medyun} ,,
  {Медьюн} @-> {Medyun} ,,
  {МЕДЬЮН} @-> {MEDYUN} ,,
  {месули} @-> {mesüli} ,,
  {Месули} @-> {Mesüli} ,,
  {МЕСУЛИ} @-> {MESÜLİ} ,,
  {мефкуре} @-> {mefküre} ,,
  {Мефкуре} @-> {Mefküre} ,,
  {МЕФКУРЕ} @-> {MEFKÜRE} ,,
  {могедек} @-> {mögedek} ,,
  {Могедек} @-> {Mögedek} ,,
